src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_VÕʹLLʼJED !!= * @CODE@ võʹllʼjed:võʹll

! E.Koponen pg. 31
! võʹllʼjed:võʹll
! +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: võʹlle
! võʹllʼjed:võʹll
:e	VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;	!!= * @CODE@ võʹlle
:ai VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; !!= * @CODE@ võʹllai
:%>j VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 

+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jin             K  ; !WG ! võʹllʼjin
+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jiim             K  ; !WG ! võʹllʼjiim
+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jiin             K  ; !WG ! võʹllʼjiin
+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jiid             K  ; !WG ! võʹllʼjiid

+Use/NG+Act+PrfPrc:%>jâmma K ;
+Use/NG+Pass+PrfPrc:%>jum K ; !

+Der/škueʹtted:%>je»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_VÕʹLLʼJED-SG3 !!= * @CODE@ võʹllʼjed:võʹll
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e    K ;   !!= * @CODE@ võʹlle
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ai K ; !!= * @CODE@ võʹllai
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ji K ;
+V+Cond+Sg3:%>jeʹči K ;
+V+Cond+ConNeg:%>jeʹče K ;
+V+Pot+Sg3:%>jež K ;
+V+Pot+ConNeg:%>ježe K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>jam K ;



!! !CLASS 3 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION


!! !CLASS 3 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION, GH
LEXICON V_KUÕCCJED !!= * @CODE@ kuõccjed:kuõcc
+V: V0_KUÕCCJED ;
LEXICON IV_KUÕCCJED !!= * @CODE@ kuõccjed:kuõcc
+V+IV: V0_KUÕCCJED ;
LEXICON TV_KUÕCCJED !!= * @CODE@ kuõccjed:kuõcc
+V+TV: V0_KUÕCCJED ;
LEXICON V0_KUÕCCJED !!= * @CODE@ kuõccjed:kuõcc

! +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuõccâǥ
! cf. kuâđđjed, võʹllʼjed
! 
!!
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: kuõccjed
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuõccai
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuõccje
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuõccje
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: kuõccâǥ
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kuõccjež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: kuõccjââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: kuõccjuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! kuõccjed:kuõcc
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ai K        ; ! kuõccai
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:âǥ K ; ! kuõccâǥ
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>jam              K  ; !
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>jak              K  ; !
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>jep      K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>jeʹped           K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>je               K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>jet K ; !

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jem             K  ; ! kuõccjem
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>jiǩ             K  ; ! kuõccjiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ji              K  ; ! ! kuõccji
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jim             K  ; ! ! kuõccjim
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jid             K  ; ! ! kuõccjid
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>je              K  ; ! kuõccje
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>ješ K ; ! kuõccješ
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>jam K ; ! kuõccjam
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>jâmma K ; ! kuõccjâmma

+Imprt+Sg3:%>jââǥǥas          K  ; !WG
+Imprt+Pl1:%>jâkap                    K  ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>jeʹǩed           K  ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>jâkaz            K  ;

+Imprt+Sg2:âǥ  K ; ! kuõccâǥ
+Imprt+ConNeg:âǥ     K ;
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>juku K ;

:%>jeʹ         VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+Pot+Sg3:%>jež K ; !WG
+Inf:%>jed K ;
+ActEss:%>jeʹmen K ;
+Actio:%>jam K ;
+Actio:%>jam N_SLOOHMAN ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>jeei K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Der/N:%>jee N_TUÕĐŠTEEI ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>jam K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>jummu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>juum K ;
Abess:%>jeǩâni K ;
:%>j GER_ ;

+Der/mmuš:%>jummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:je»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


!! !CLASS 3 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION, GH

LEXICON V_STÅÅRJED
+V: V0_STÅÅRJED ;
LEXICON IV_STÅÅRJED
+V+IV: V0_STÅÅRJED ;
LEXICON TV_STÅÅRJED
+V+TV: V0_STÅÅRJED ;
LEXICON V0_STÅÅRJED
! page 388
! ståårjed:ståår
!  (ij stååraǥ)
! Work to be done 2015-01-10
+Imprt+Sg2:%^IMPSG2     K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:aǥ K ;
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: ståårjed
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ståårai
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ståårje
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ståårje
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: stååraǥ
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ståårjež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ståårjââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ståårjuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! ståårjed:ståår
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ai K        ;		! ståårai
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:aǥ K ;   		! ståårâǥ
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>jam              K  ; 	! ståårjam
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>jak              K  ; !
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>jep      K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>jeʹped           K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>je               K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>jet K ; !

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jem             K  ; ! ståårjem
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>jiǩ             K  ; ! ståårjiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ji              K  ; ! ! ståårji
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jim             K  ; ! ! ståårjim
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jid             K  ; ! ! ståårjid
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>je              K  ; ! ståårje
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>ješ K ; ! ståårješ
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>jam K ; ! ståårjam
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>jâmma K ; ! ståårjâmma

+Imprt+Sg3:%>jââǥǥas          K  ; ! ståårjââǥǥas
+Imprt+Pl1:%>jâkap            K  ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>jeʹǩed           K  ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>jâkaz            K  ;

+Imprt+Sg2:aǥ  K ; ! stååraǥ
+Imprt+ConNeg:aǥ     K ;
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>juku K ;

:%>jeʹ         VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+Pot+Sg3:%>jež K ; !WG
+Inf:%>jed K ;
+ActEss:%>jeʹmen K ;
+Actio:%>jam K ;
+Actio:%>jam N_SLOOHMAN ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>jeei K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Der/N:%>jee N_TUÕĐŠTEEI ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>jam K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>jummu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>juum K ;
Abess:%>jeǩâni K ;
:%>j GER_ ;

+Der/mmuš:%>jummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:je»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


!  -jed -ted

!!

!! !CLASS 4 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION

LEXICON V_SILTTEED !!= * @CODE@ siltteed:siltt
+V: V0_SILTTEED ;
LEXICON IV_SILTTEED !!= * @CODE@ siltteed:siltt
+V+IV: V0_SILTTEED ;
LEXICON TV_SILTTEED !!= * @CODE@ siltteed:siltt
+V+TV: V0_SILTTEED ;
LEXICON V0_SILTTEED !!= * @CODE@ siltteed:siltt

! Ind+Prs+ConNeg: -âd
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%>âd VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-ELSE ; !!= * @CODE@ 



!! !CLASS 4 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_SOLLEED
+V: V0_SOLLEED ;
LEXICON IV_SOLLEED
+V+IV: V0_SOLLEED ;
LEXICON TV_SOLLEED
+V+TV: V0_SOLLEED ;
LEXICON V0_SOLLEED
! Ind+Prs+ConNeg: -ad
! solleed:soll
! * Yaml: __V-solleed__
! +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: sollad
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%>ad VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-ELSE ; !!= * @CODE@


!! !CLASS 4 HIGH VOWEL,  PALATALIZATION

!! !CLASS 4 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION

LEXICON V_TEEʹMEED
+V: V0_TEEʹMEED ;
LEXICON IV_TEEʹMEED
+V+IV: V0_TEEʹMEED ;
LEXICON TV_TEEʹMEED
+V+TV: V0_TEEʹMEED ;
LEXICON V0_TEEʹMEED
! Ind+Prs+ConNeg: Palatalization AND -ed
! teeʹmeed:teeʹm
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%>ed VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
: VSUF-TEEʹMEED-ELSE ; !!= * @CODE@


!! Not yet written









! Intermediate suffix lexica
! --------------------------


! Final suffix lexica
! -------------------

! Suffix series I
! - - - - - - - -

! assuming stem __viǯǯ__


! Present tense
! - - - - - - - -

! assuming stem _teevv_

! assuming stem _kâlmm_

! assuming stem _juʹrdd_

! assuming stem _tieʹtt_
LEXICON VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-SG3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ad K ; !!= * @CODE@ teeʹmad

LEXICON	VSUF-TEEʹMEED-IND-PRS-CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:  K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:  K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:  K ;
