src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
akkeed:akk V_SILTTEED ;
aukkeed:aukk V_SILTTEED ;
aukkjed:aukk V_KUÕCCJED ;
bluuttjed:bluutt V_KUÕCCJED ;
ciiunʼjed:ciiun V_KUÕCCJED ;
cuuleed:cuul V_SILTTEED ;
cõõggjed:cõõgg V_KUÕCCJED ;
euʹnneed:euʹnn V_TEEʹMEED ;
feʹrttjed:feʹrtt V_VÕʹLLʼJED-SG3 ;
fuʹsǩǩeed:fuʹsǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
heätteed:heätt V_SOLLEED ;
heäʹmmeed:heäʹmm V_TEEʹMEED ;
huuveed:huuv V_SILTTEED ;
hââppeed:hââpp V_SOLLEED ;
hâʹddeed:hâʹdd V_TEEʹMEED ;
ištteed:ištt V_SILTTEED ;
jiâreed:jiâr V_SILTTEED ;
jooreed:joor V_SILTTEED ;
juuhlʼjed:juuhl V_KUÕCCJED ;
juʹvǧǧeed:juʹvǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
jämmeed:jämm V_SOLLEED ;
jõõđeed:jõõđ V_SILTTEED ;
kartteed:kartt V_SILTTEED ;
kaʹŋǩǩeed:kaʹŋǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
koʹrvveed:koʹrvv V_TEEʹMEED ;
kuâldeed:kuâld V_SOLLEED ;
kuâreed:kuâr V_SOLLEED ;
kuäiveed:kuäiv V_SOLLEED ;
kuärŋeed:kuärŋ V_SOLLEED ;
kuäškeed:kuäšk V_SOLLEED ;
kuålggeed:kuålgg V_SILTTEED ;
kuõccjed:kuõcc V_KUÕCCJED ;
kuõppjed:kuõpp V_KUÕCCJED ;
kuʹmmeed:kuʹmm V_TEEʹMEED ;
kârreed:kârr V_SOLLEED ;
kääiǥeed:kääiǥ V_SOLLEED ;
kålggeed:kålgg V_SILTTEED ;
kõrreed:kõrr V_SILTTEED ;
kõõmeed:kõõm V_SILTTEED ;
laiʹddstõõleed:laiʹddstõõl V_SILTTEED ;
laʹsǩǩeed:laʹsǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
livveed:livv V_SILTTEED ;
liʹšǩǩeed:liʹšǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
lokkeed:lokk V_SILTTEED ;
lueikeed:lueik V_SOLLEED ;
luvvjed:luvv V_KUÕCCJED ;
luâđđeed:luâđđ V_SOLLEED ;
lââppeed:lââpp V_SOLLEED ;
läivveed:läivv V_SOLLEED ;
maaneed:maan V_SILTTEED ;
mallʼjed:mall V_KUÕCCJED ;
metteed:mett V_SOLLEED ;
mieʹrreed:mieʹrr V_TEEʹMEED ;
mikksjed:mikks V_KUÕCCJED ;
miõllpuâreed:miõllpuâr V_SOLLEED ;
mueʹǩǩeed:mueʹǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
mââʹjeed:mââʹj V_TEEʹMEED ;
mååreed:måår V_SILTTEED ;
neälggeed:neälgg V_SOLLEED ;
njaukkeed:njaukk V_SILTTEED ;
njonneed:njonn V_SOLLEED ;
njoođeed:njoođ V_SOLLEED ;
njuiʹǩǩeed:njuiʹǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
njââlʼjed:njââl V_STÅÅRJED ;
njäärbeed:njäärb V_SOLLEED ;
njääʹrbeed:njääʹrb V_TEEʹMEED ;
nooreed:noor V_SILTTEED ;
nââneed:nâân V_SOLLEED ;
nõõmeed:nõõm V_SILTTEED ;
oiʹǧǧeed:oiʹǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
paakkeed:paakk V_SILTTEED ;
paʹrǩǩeed:paʹrǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
peʹrrjeed:peʹrrj V_TEEʹMEED ;
piiǯǯeed:piiǯǯ V_SILTTEED ;
pleâneed:pleân V_SOLLEED ;
praaveed:praav V_SILTTEED ;
praavjed:praav V_KUÕCCJED ;
pråppeed:pråpp V_SOLLEED ;
pueʹreed:pueʹr V_TEEʹMEED ;
puutšjed:puutš V_KUÕCCJED ;
puârvveed:puârvv V_SOLLEED ;
puʹrǧǧeed:puʹrǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
pääkkeed:pääkk V_SOLLEED ;
pääʹtrjed:pääʹtr V_STÅÅRJED ;
päʹnneed:päʹnn V_TEEʹMEED ;
pååneed:påån V_SOLLEED ;
raamjed:raam V_KUÕCCJED ;
raaveed:raav V_SILTTEED ;
reiʹǧǧeed:reiʹǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
riõttjed:riõtt V_KUÕCCJED ;
rumbbjed:rumbb V_KUÕCCJED ;
ruppeed:rupp V_SILTTEED ;
ruvjjed:ruvj V_KUÕCCJED ;
ruâneed:ruân V_SOLLEED ;
ruʹvǩǩeed:ruʹvǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
rââššeed:rââšš V_SOLLEED ;
sarreed:sarr V_SILTTEED ;
seiʹlleed:seiʹll V_TEEʹMEED ;
siltteed:siltt V_SILTTEED ;
siʹŋŋeed:siʹŋŋ V_TEEʹMEED ;
smavveed:smavv V_SILTTEED ;
staaneed:staan V_SILTTEED ;
stappjed:stapp V_KUÕCCJED ;
staʹǧǧeed:staʹǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
ståårjed:ståår V_STÅÅRJED ;
suuǥǥeed:suuǥǥ V_SILTTEED ;
suuʹčjed:suuʹč V_KUÕCCJED ;
suâkkeed:suâkk V_SOLLEED ;
suânnʼjed:suânˈn V_KUÕCCJED ;
suânnʼjed:suânˈn V_STÅÅRJED ;
suälvveed:suälvv V_SOLLEED ;
suõvveed:suõvv V_SILTTEED ;
suõʹrǧǧeed:suõʹrǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
särreed:särr V_SOLLEED ;
sǩeuʹnnjeed:sǩeuʹnnj V_TEEʹMEED ;
sǩeâppeed:sǩeâpp V_SOLLEED ;
sǩiâŋkeed:sǩiâŋk V_SILTTEED ;
taʹrǩǩeed:taʹrǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
teivveed:teivv V_SOLLEED ;
teälleed:teäll V_SOLLEED ;
teäʹmeed:teäʹm V_TEEʹMEED ;
tiâreed:tiâr V_SILTTEED ;
tiʹǧǧeed:tiʹǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
tueʹrreed:tueʹrr V_TEEʹMEED ;
tuunnʼjed:tuunn V_KUÕCCJED ;
tuužžeed:tuužž V_SILTTEED ;
tuâlleed:tuâll V_SOLLEED ;
tuärjjeed:tuärjj V_SOLLEED ;
tuõnnʼjed:tuõnn V_KUÕCCJED ;
tuõppjed:tuõpp V_KUÕCCJED ;
tuškkeed:tuškk V_SILTTEED ;
tuʹtǩǩeed:tuʹtǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
tävvteed:tävvt V_SOLLEED ;
täʹǩǩeed:täʹǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
tålcceed:tålcc V_SOLLEED ;
tõppjed:tõpp V_KUÕCCJED ;
uurčeed:uurč V_SILTTEED ;
vackkjed:vackk V_KUÕCCJED ;
vauʹlleed:vauʹll V_TEEʹMEED ;
veiʹǩǩeed:veiʹǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
veâlǥeed:veâlǥ V_SOLLEED ;
vieʹsseed:vieʹss V_TEEʹMEED ;
viiǯǯeed:viiǯǯ V_SILTTEED ;
visseed:viss V_SILTTEED ;
viâppjed:viâpp V_KUÕCCJED ;
viʒʒjed:viʒʒ V_KUÕCCJED ;
vueʹlǧǧeed:vueʹlǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
vuâđeed:vuâđ V_SOLLEED ;
vuäǯǯeed:vuäǯǯ V_SOLLEED ;
vuõjeed:vuõj V_SILTTEED ;
võiddeed:võidd V_SILTTEED ;
âskkeed:âskk V_SOLLEED ;
ââʹldeed:ââʹld V_TEEʹMEED ;
äuʹǩǩeed:äuʹǩǩ V_TEEʹMEED ;
ääʹveed:ääʹv V_TEEʹMEED ;
åstteed:åstt V_SOLLEED ;
õlmmeed:õlmm V_SILTTEED ;
čeäǥǥeed:čeäǥǥ V_SOLLEED ;
čieʹrǧǧeed:čieʹrǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
čiisteed:čiist V_SILTTEED ;
čoorǥeed:čoorǥ V_SILTTEED ;
čoʹlǧǧeed:čoʹlǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
čuureed:čuur V_SILTTEED ;
čuõveed:čuõv V_SILTTEED ;
čâlmmeed:čâlmm V_SOLLEED ;
čâʹlmmeed:čâʹlmm V_TEEʹMEED ;
škaaleed:škaal V_SILTTEED ;
škornneed:škornn V_SOLLEED ;
šuuʹreed:šuuʹr V_TEEʹMEED ;
šuõršjed:šuõrš V_KUÕCCJED ;
šõkkeed:šõkk V_SILTTEED ;
ǩeeʹʒʒeed:ǩeeʹʒʒ V_TEEʹMEED ;
ǩeâlǥeed:ǩeâlǥ V_SOLLEED ;
ǩeärddeed:ǩeärdd V_SOLLEED ;
ǩeäʹrǥeed:ǩeäʹrǥ V_TEEʹMEED ;
ǩeʹrǧǧeed:ǩeʹrǧǧ V_TEEʹMEED ;
ǩiõbrnʼjed:ǩiõbrn V_KUÕCCJED ;
ǩiõbrrnʼjed:ǩiõbrrn V_KUÕCCJED ;
ǩiõzzeed:ǩiõzz V_SILTTEED ;
